District of Columbia statutes.
16-581

Rules of procedure.

The judges of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia and of the United States District Court for the District of Columbia shall establish such rules of procedure for their respective courts as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this subchapter.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 557, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 555, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(b)(5)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-581.
1973 Ed., § 16-581.